District of Columbia statutes.
48-705

Renewal of license.

Prior to the expiration of a license, the Mayor shall mail a renewal notice to the licensee that includes:

(1)

The expiration date of the current license;

(2)

The date by which the renewal application must be received by the Mayor in order for the renewal license to be issued and mailed to the licensee before the licensee’s current license expires;

(3)

The amount of the renewal fee; and

(4)

Any other information the Mayor deems appropriate or necessary to renew the license.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-137, § 6, 37 DCR 2631

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-1005.